Connecticut, session 2026, SB00245.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (b) of section 32-286 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(b) Any person that anticipates it will own, operate or be a colocation
tenant in a qualified data center in this state may apply to the
Commissioner of Economic and Community Development to enter into
an agreement in accordance with the provisions of subsection (c) of this
section, for exemption from the taxes imposed under chapters 203 and
219 as set forth in subsections (d) and (e) of this section, provided no
such application may be accepted by the commissioner on or after July
1, 2026.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 32-286(b)
LCO 1419 1 of 2

Raised Bill No. 245
ET Joint Favorable C/R FIN
LCO 1419 2 of 2